Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.21, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Payments. (a) The commissioner shall provide payments under this section to all eligible programs on a noncompetitive basis. The payment amounts shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent staff who regularly care for children in the program, including any employees, sole proprietors, or independent contractors. (b) For purposes of this section, "one full-time equivalent" is defined as an individual caring for childrennew text begin , participating in professional development or training, or lesson planning fornew text end 32 hours per week. An individual can count as more or less than one full-time equivalent staff, but as no more than two full-time equivalent staff. (c) The commissioner must establish an amount to award per full-time equivalent individual who regularly cares for children in the program. (d) Payments must be increased by ten percent for programs receiving child care assistance payments under section 142E.08 or 142E.17 or early learning scholarships under section 142D.25, or for programs located in a child care access equity area. The commissioner must develop a method for establishing child care access equity areas. For purposes of this section, "child care access equity area" means an area with low access to child care, high poverty rates, high unemployment rates, low homeownership rates, and low median household incomes. (e) The commissioner shall establish the form, frequency, and manner for making payments under this section.